Massachusetts, session 194th, H425.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. (a) Notwithstanding section 17 of chapter 138 of the General Laws, the
licensing authority of the town of Ashland may grant 16 additional licenses for the sale of all
alcoholic beverages to be drunk on the premises pursuant to section 12 of said chapter 138 and
shall be subject to all of said chapter 138 except said section 17.
(b) A license granted pursuant to this section shall only be exercised in the dining room
of a common victualler and in such other public rooms or areas as may be deemed reasonable
and appropriate by the licensing authority as certified in writing.
(c) If a licensee terminates or fails to renew a license granted under this act or any such
license granted under this act is cancelled, revoked or no longer in use, the license shall be
returned physically, with all of the legal rights, privileges and restrictions pertaining thereto, to
of 2

the licensing authority and the licensing authority may then grant the license to a new applicant
under the same conditions specified in this act.
(d) All licenses granted under this act shall be issued within 10 years after the effective
date of this act; provided, however, that a license originally granted within that time period may
be granted to a new applicant under subsection (c) thereafter.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2